test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-mowew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mowêw - eat him/her : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - p 401; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 79, 103

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nimowâw # SET I
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kimowâw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nimowânân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kimowânaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kimowâwâw
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nimowâwak # SET I-Pl
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kimowâwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nimowânânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kimowânawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kimowâwâwak
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kimowin # SET II
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kimowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kimowinâwâw
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowêw # SET III
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowêwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowêyiwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: mowimêw # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowimêwak # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nimowimâwa # SET IV
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kimowimâwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nimowimânâna
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimowimânawa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimowimâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-mowâw, nikîmowâw] # SET I (past)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-mowâw, kikîmowâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-mowânân, nikîmowânân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-mowânaw, kikîmowânaw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-mowâwâw, kikîmowâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-mowâwak, nikîmowâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-mowâwak, kikîmowâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-mowânânak, nikîmowânânak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-mowânawak, kikîmowânawak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-mowâwâwak, kikîmowâwâwak]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-mowin, kikîmowin] # SET II (past)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-mowinân, kikîmowinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-mowinâwâw, kikîmowinâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêw, kîmowêw] # SET III (past)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêwak, kîmowêwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêyiwa, kîmowêyiwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowimêw, kîmowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowimêwak, kîmowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-mowimâwa, nikîmowimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimâwa, kikîmowimâwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-mowimânâna, nikîmowimânâna]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimânawa, kikîmowimânawa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimâwâwa, kikîmowimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-mowâw, nikamowâw] # SET I (Fut+Def)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-mowâw, kikamowâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-mowânân, nikamowânân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-mowânaw, kikamowânaw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-mowâwâw, kikamowâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-mowâwak, nikamowâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Def)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-mowâwak, kikamowâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-mowânânak, nikamowânânak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-mowânawak, kikamowânawak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-mowâwâwak, kikamowâwâwak]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-mowin, kikamowin] # SET II (Fut+Def)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-mowinân, kikamowinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-mowinâwâw, kikamowinâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêw, kamowêw] # SET III (Fut+Def)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêwak, kamowêwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêyiwa, kamowêyiwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowimêw, kamowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowimêwak, kamowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-mowimâwa, nikamowimâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Def)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimâwa, kikamowimâwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-mowimânâna, nikamowimânâna]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimânawa, kikamowimânawa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimâwâwa, kikamowimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-mowâw, niwîmowâw] # SET I (Fut+Int)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-mowâw, kiwîmowâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-mowânân, niwîmowânân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-mowânaw, kiwîmowânaw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-mowâwâw, kiwîmowâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-mowâwak, niwîmowâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Int)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-mowâwak, kiwîmowâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-mowânânak, niwîmowânânak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-mowânawak, kiwîmowânawak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-mowâwâwak, kiwîmowâwâwak]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-mowin, kiwîmowin] # SET II (Fut+Int)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-mowinân, kiwîmowinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-mowinâwâw, kiwîmowinâwâw]
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêw, wîmowêw] # SET III (Fut+Int)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêwak, wîmowêwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêyiwa, wîmowêyiwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowimêw, wîmowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowimêwak, wîmowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-mowimâwa, niwîmowimâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Int)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimâwa, kiwîmowimâwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-mowimânâna, niwîmowimânâna]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimânawa, kiwîmowimânawa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimâwâwa, kiwîmowimâwâwa]
     



     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nimowik  # SET I inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kimowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nimowikonân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kimowikonaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kimowikowâw
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nimowikwak # SET I-Pl inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kimowikwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nimowikonânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwak
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kimowitin # SET II inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kimowitinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kimowitinâwâw
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: mowik # SET III inv (no 5-3 according to Wolvengrey)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: mowikwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowikoyiwa
          
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nimowikoyiwa # SET IV inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kimowikoyiwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nimowikonâna
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwa
     
     
     
     
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowak, êmowak] # SET I
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowat, êmowat]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyâhk, êmowâyâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyahk, êmowâyahk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyêk, êmowâyêk]

     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowakik, êmowakik] # SET I-Pl
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowacik, êmowacik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyâhkik, êmowâyâhkik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyahkok, êmowâyahkok]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyêkok, êmowâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowiyan, êmowiyan] # SET II
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowiyâhk, êmowiyâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowiyêk, êmowiyêk]    
     
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowât, êmowât] # SET III
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowâcik, êmowâcik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimât, êmowimât]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâcik, êmowimâcik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowâyit, êmowâyit]

     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimak, êmowimak] # SET IV
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimat, êmowimat]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyâhk, êmowimâyâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyahk, êmowimâyahk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyêk, êmowimâyêk]
     
     
     
     
     
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowit, êmowit] # SET I inv
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowisk, êmowisk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk, êmowikoyâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk, êmowikoyahk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêk, êmowikoyêk]

     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowicik, êmowicik] # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowiskik, êmowiskik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhkik, êmowikoyâhkik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahkok, êmowikoyahkok]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêkok, êmowikoyêkok]

     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowitân, êmowitân] # SET II inv
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-mowitâhk, êmowitâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowitakok, êmowitakok]

     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowikot, êmowikot] # SET III inv
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowikocik, êmowikocik]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowikoyit, êmowikoyit]
          
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowimit, êmowimit] # SET IV inv
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowimisk, êmowimisk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk, êmowikoyâhk, ê-mowikowâyâhk, êmowikowâyâhk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêk, êmowikoyêk, ê-mowikowâyêk, êmowikowâyêk]
     PV/e+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk, êmowikoyahk, ê-mowikowâyahk, êmowikowâyahk]
     




     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: mowak # SET I
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: mowat
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: mowâyahk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: mowâyêk

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: mowakik # SET I-Pl
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: mowacik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: mowâyahkok
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: mowâyêkok 
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: mowiyan # SET II
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: mowiyâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: mowiyêk    
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowât # SET III
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowâcik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: mowimât
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowimâcik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowâyit
